src/fst/phonology.twolc
!Eli kun ensi tavussa on pyöreä vokaali (esim. -u tai -o), vartalon loppuvokaali jää pois -i (tai vastaavan -j) suffiksin edeltä
!Poika-nominissa on pyöreä vokali -o, siksi poikhiin. Siinä on myös diftonki oi
!Luin, että  u- tai o-alkuisen diftongin jäljessä vartalon loppuvokaali katoaa (esim ruoka: ruokhiin, poika: poikhiin jne)

!Sitte vartalon loppuvokaali muuttu o:ksi, kun vartalon alussa on a-, e- tai i-, esimerkiksi reuna: reunhoin, aika:aikhoin



"Stem deletion in h-illative"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
Vx:0 <=> :SurfaceCns _ (%^E2I:) %^HMETA: %> h [:Vx|i:] ;
         :SurfaceCns _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA: %> h [:Vx|i:] ;
         :SurfaceCns _  %^AO:   %^HMETA: %> h (%^V:) (:o) %> i2: ;
         :i          _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA: %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ;
   where Vx in ( o u y ö ) ; ! removing a, e, ä, i

!! **Tests:**

!!€ syksy^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ syks00>hyyn












!! ### Stem alternation rules
!  ========================

!"Stem shortening for consonant initial suffixes"
! Vx:0 <=> Vx _ %^VDEL:0  (Dummy:) %> [s|t] ;
!     where Vx in ( i ä ) ; ! a, e away




!! ### e rules
!  =========

"e:i in nom.sg. of e-stems and in n_23ia kauhia hopia in Var"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
e:i <=> Cns: (0:Cns) _ (Dial:0) %^E2I:0 [#:|.#.|%> i5: |%> \i2:] ; ! nom.sg of e-stems
        (Cns) Vow (Vow) ([n|l|r]) Cns (Cns:0) _ %^E2I:0 %^¤:0 %> [ %^A: | h ]; ! E2I for e:i hoppe^E2I^¤>^A -> hopia, kauhia in Var

!!€ ove^E2I
!!€ ovi0

! TODO Write more tests, with Cns:0 (specifically k:0) when sorted out which are truly adj.
!!€ kauhe^E2I^¤>^A
!!€ kauhi00>a

"e:0 in consonant stems and illative plural"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 e:0 <=>     (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) (%^WG:) ([%^AO:|%^AE:|%^VDEL:]) (%^WG:)   %> [i3:|i4:] ;
             (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) (%^WG:) ([%^AO:|%^AE:|%^VDEL:])  %^EDEL:0 %> [t|h]; !here ^WG^AO, but usually ^VDEL^WG. Hmm
  :Vow [:SurfaceCns | Cns:0] Cns:* _ (Dial:0) (%^WG:0)  %> i2: ;! hyksiksi, ja Cns:0->joiksi ! L-context bec of tie>i2 : t0e0i
                              :Cns _ (Dial:0) (%^E2I:0) %> i2: ; ! jok uusine TODO why jok e:0 i2 i n ? And not e:i?
                              :Cns _ (Dial:0) (%^E2I:0) %^HMETA:0 %> h [%^V:|i] ; ! uutheen
             (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) %^WG:0 (%^T0:0) %^E0:0 %> t %^A: ; !taivalta sgpar +tytärtä
             (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) %^WG:0 (%^T0:0) %^E0:0 ; ! taival/tytär sgnom and tyven we add e b4 Dial trig.
                              :Cns _  %^VDEL:0  (Dummy:) %> [s|t] ;
                                   _ e %> ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) [ i | i2: | i3: | i4:] ; ! = aShortening of long vowel in front of i
                              [.#.|#] Cns:* [Vow Vow|u] l _ %> t e n ; ! kielten, puolten
                              [.#.|#] Cns:* [Vow Vow|e] r _ %> t e n ; ! merten, puolten
[.#.|#|%-] Cns:* [i [e|i]|u ([u|o])|y y|ä ä|e (e)|a i] :n _ %> t e n ; !unten, lunten, sienten, lienten
![.#.|#] Cns:* [i [e|i]|u [u|o]|y y|ä ä|e (e)|a i] :[l|r] _ %> t e n ; !kielten, merten, puolten
![.#.|#] Cns:* [i [e|i]|u ([u|o])|y y|ä ä|e (e)|a i] :n   _ %> t e n ; !unten, lunten, sienten, lienten

!                      Cns i e :Cns _ %> t e n ; !kielten sienten
!         (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) %^WG:0 ;

! TODO TODO TODO
! WTF; Toimii Twolc:ssä mutta ei kun kompiloi, miks?
! [ 2/75][FAIL] tyven+A+Sg+Gen => Missing results: tyvenen
! [ 2/75][FAIL] tyven+A+Sg+Gen => Unexpected results: tyvenn
!!€ tyvene^Por^WG>n
!!€ tyvene00>n
! t
! y
! v
! e
! n
! e
! ^Por:0
! ^WG:0
! >
! n
! ACCEPTED
!
! Lexical string ('q' = quit): tyvene^Por^WG>n
! Surface string ('q' = quit): tyven000>n
! t
! y
! v
! e
! n
! e:0
! ^Por:0
! ^WG:0
! >
! n
! REJECTED: "e:0 in consonant stems and illative plural" fails in state 25.


!! **Tests:**

!!€ kiele>ten
!!€ kiel0>ten
!!€ ytime^HMETA>h^V^V>
!!€ ytim00>hee>
!!€ elläime^HMETA>h^V^V>
!!€ elläim00>hee>
!!€ aukaise>i3
!!€ aukais0>i
!!€ vuote^HMETA>hii
!!€ vuos00>hii

"Cns:0 in hoppe- hope-a in Var & Jok"
!! @RULENAME@
 Cx:0 <=> (Cns) Vow (Vow) ([n|l|r]) Cx:  _ e: (%^E2I:0 | %^A2I:0) %^¤:0  %> [ %^A: | i2: | i5: | h ] ;
    where Cx in ( b d f g h j k m p q s w x z p2 k2 ) ; ! E2I is for e:i hopia. We have l and r word, not yet for n but imaginatine :)
    ! TODO We could further restict these Consonants



!! ### i rules
!  =========
!! The -i- rules require different i-s for different POS.

"i:0"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! 1. "i:0 in par and gen pl of i-stems in plural of i-final diphtong stems in past tense and conditional tense"
! 2. "Stem shortening for consonant initial suffixes"
! 3. i:0 in vanha_n_21 -Por with I0 tag"
! 4. "Stem deletion in h-illative"
! 5. "Shortening of long vowel in front of i"
 i:0 <=> [#:|.#.] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:* (:Cns)              _ (%^WG:) (%^AO:)    %>  :i %> [ %^V: n | %^V: | t t e ] ; ! 1. ! ristien, kväänitten, papiiksi
                               :Cns (Cns:)              _ Dummy:*            %> [ i3:i | i4:i ] ; ! 1. ! leikin, tohtisin, ilvetin
                            [#:|.#.|:Cns] [a|e|o|u|y|ö] _                    %> [i2:|i3:|i ]    ; ! 1.   ! tuoresta0>i2ksi, nai>i2>n
         [#:|.#.] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:* (:Cns)              _ (%^WG:)            %> i2:i            ; ! 1. ! Note: This shall not work for Ci forms skaramelli
                                                      i _ %^VDEL:0  (Dummy:) %> [s|t]           ; ! 2.
                                                   Cns: _ (%^WG:0) %^AO:0    %> %^I0:0 i2:i %>  ; ! 3. ! TODO Add dialect tags here ! tooline in Var ja Jok. Not tooliine, which is in Por
                                            :SurfaceCns _ (%^E2I:) %^HMETA:  %> h [:i|i:]                    ; ! 4.
                                            :SurfaceCns _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA:  %> h [:i|i:]                    ; ! 4.
                                            :SurfaceCns _  %^AO:   %^HMETA:  %> h (%^V:) (:o) %> i2:         ; ! 4.
                                            :i          _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA:  %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ; ! 4.
                                                        _ e %> ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) [ i | i2: | i3: | i4:]     ; ! 5.





!! ### a rules
!  =========

"a:0 before Pret and Pl i when rounded root vowel"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
a:0 <=> [#:|.#.] (Cns:*) (RoundedVow) [u|o] ([i6:|i:]) (:i) :Cns+ Cns:* (:Cns) _ (%^WG:0) %^AO:0 (%^I0:0) %> [i3:] ;
        [#:|.#.] (Cns:*) (RoundedVow) [u|o] ([i6:|i:]) (:i) :Cns+ Cns:* (:Cns) _ %^AO:0 a:0 ;
        ! TODO which case is a:0 at the end? Also kuvina/e here, i or not, depends on the dialects remember.
        ! Also: used to have %^AO: as optional in (),
        [#:|.#.]  Cns    (RoundedVow) [u|o]  (i6:)                        Cns  _ %^A0:0 (%^I0:0) %> i2:i %> n  [e | :a | :ä ] ;
! TODO TODO if ^A: it says no realizations, if :a | :ä it just ignores them?
! TODO check if context should be more extensive. NOT :Cns though!
[#:|.#.] (Cns:*) RoundedVow (Vow) Cns: (Cns:)(a)[:a|:e][:v|:m] _ (Dial:)(%^WG:0) (%^A0:0) (%>) ([i2:|i])  %> (i) :i (i) %> ;
         ! check first (i)? <- What is this? added :i to catch loistaava superl too. should be [i2:|i5:]?
[#:|.#.] (Cns:*) RoundedVow (Vow) Cns: (Cns:)(a)[:a|:e][:v|:m] _ (Dial:)(%^WG:0) (%^A0:0) (%>) (i)        %> (i) :i (i) %> ;
                                                               _ a (Dial:) %> ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) [ i | i2: | i3: | i4:] ; ! = Shortening of long vowel in front of i
                 Vow:+ Cns: (Cns:)                             _ (Dial:) (%^WG:0) %> i3: (%>) ; ! kirjoitan/tin
                                                     :SurfaceCns (Vow:*) _ (Dial:) ([%^E2I:|%^AO:]) %^HMETA:  %> h [:a|i:] ; ! aikhaan
                                                     :SurfaceCns (Vow:*) _ (Dial:)  %^AO:   %^HMETA:  %> h (%^V:) (:o) %> i2: ;
                                                     :i          _ (Dial:) (%^AO:)  %^HMETA:  %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ;
                                                               a _ %^VDEL:0  ([Dummy: - %^A2I:]) %> [s|t] ; ! rakkaa^VDEL^WGs : rakas
                                                                 _ (Dial:) (%^WG:0) %^A0:0 ; ! ^A0 is always a:0
                                                                 _ i5: ; ! loistaaviimmin
!         :SurfaceCns _ (Dial:) (%^E2I:) (%^HMETA:) %> h [:a|i:] ; ! "Stem deletion of a in h-illative"
!         :SurfaceCns _ (Dial:) (%^AO:)  (%^HMETA:) %> h (%^V:) (:o) %> i2: ; ! "Stem deletion of a in h-illative"
!         :i          _ (Dial:) (%^AO:)  (%^HMETA:) %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ; ! "Stem deletion of a in h-illative"


!! **Tests:**

!!€ varma^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ varm00>haan
!!€ rakkaa^VDEL^WG>s
!!€ rak0a000>s
! TODO maybe change the system to be ^WG then VDEL, if so, fix this test afterwards



! TODO TODO TODO TODO TODO a lot of the AO contexts are no longer! As they are replaced by the A0 tag in lexc


! TODO TODO TODO talk to Aili about making a REALLY GOOD RoundedVowUOYÖ (a|e|i) alternative structure!!!
! anttaat:anta antoi mutta luottaat:luotta luotti
! Elikkäs anta^AO>i3 a:o
! Mutta luotta^AO>i3 a:0
!    l               u o                  t            t    0    0   >  i
!          RoundedVowY:+               Cns:        (Cns:) _ %^AO: %> i3: ; ! antoi (ja muita v2 w/a:o)
!vs
![#:|.#.] UnroundedVowEAIÄ ([u|i|e|a]) Cns: (:Cns) (Cns:) _ %^AO: %> i3: ; ! sannoi 2 syll
!                        a                 n           t    o    0   >  i

!"^A:A aina"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
!%^A:a <=> _ .#. ;

!!€ otta^WG>i3n
!!€ ot000>in

! TODO Seems to work in lexc?
! !!€ kajava^WG>i2>ss^A
! !!€ kajav00>i>ssa
! !!€ kajava>i2i>t^A
! !!€ kajav0>ii>ta

!!€ loistaava^WG>i2>ss^A
!!€ loistaav00>i>ssa

! TODO TODO TODO TODO vi vil ha (in pseudokode/regex speak): \n Cns UnroundedVow .+ _ ^AOellerannaTrigger også right side context
! trur ikke det som e imellon {{ordstart Cns UnroundedVow}} og _ RightSideContext har nåkka å si! Simplifiser bort!!

"a:o before Pl i and Pret i" ! which context is Pret i? TODO if you cannot find, just delete
! WG always before AO always before AO
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
a:o <=> [#:|.#.] Cns:* UnroundedVow ([u|i|e|a]) (Cns:*) (Vow:*) Cns:+ (:Cns) _ (Dial:) (%^WG:0) (%^I0:0) %^AO: %> [j|i2:|i3:|i5:] ; ! sannoi
        [#:|.#.] Cns:* UnroundedVow (o|u) (Cns:+) (Vow:+) (Cns:+) (Vow:+)    _ (Dial:) (%^WG:0) (%^I0:0) %^AO: %> i2: ;
        [#:|.#.] Cns:* RoundedVow (Cns:+) (Vow:*) (Cns:*) (Vow:*) (Cns:+) (:Cns) _ (Dial:) (%^WG:0)      %^AO: %> i2: ; !mustikoissa
                [:k|:l|:t]  (:i) :i             :j                                _ (Dial:) (%^WG:0)          %^AO: %> i2: ; !kulkiijoissa
                  :s       :i :i             :j                                _ (Dial:) (%^WG:0)          %^AO: %> i2: ; !katkasiijoissa
           [#:|.#.] Cns  Vow                      Cns   Cns                    _ (Dial:)                   %^AO: %> j %> %^A: ; !linnoja Var
!     Cns         Vow (Vow)         Cns          _ (%^WG:0) %^AO:           %>     i2: ; ! vaaroitten, persoonoissa
     !p e r s o o n _ (%^WG:0) %^AO:           %>     i2: ; ! vaaroitten, persoonoissa
!               s            a                n      0                  a               ^AO > i2
!               s            a                n      n                  o               0 >  i
!         a          i         k     k   a  ^AO  %> i2      >   n   e
! Cns (Cns:*) UnroundedVow ([o|u]) Cns:* ([Cns:*|:Cns]) (k:0) _ (%^WG:0) %^AO: (%^I0:0) %>     i2: ; ! sivakoissa sannoi
! Cns (Cns:*) UnroundedVow ([o|u]) Cns:* ([Cns:*|:Cns]) (k:0) _ (%^WG:0) %^AO: %^HMETA: %> %^V i2: ; ! aikhoin

!!€ matka^Por^AO>i2
!!€ matko00>i

"ä:ö before Pl i"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
ä:ö <=>  Cns: FrontVow+ Cns:+ Vow:+ ([j|k :0|l|n]) (t:0) _ (Dial:) (%^WG:0) %^AO: %> i2: ; ! kynttilöitä, tekkiijöitä, peniköitä

! Sitte vartalon loppuvokaali muuttu o:ksi, kun vartalon alussa on a-, e- tai i- (ei pyöreä vokaali)
! , esimerkiksi reuna: reunhoin, aika:aikhoin
